Utah statutes.
61-2e-201.   Registration required -- Qualification for registration.
(1) Unless registered under this chapter or exempt under Section 61-2e-104, an
entity may not with regard to a real estate appraisal activity for real estate
located in this state:
(a)  directly or indirectly engage or attempt to engage in business as an
appraisal management company;
(b)  directly or indirectly engage or attempt to perform an appraisal
management service; or
(c)  advertise or hold itself out as engaging in or conducting business as an
appraisal management company.
(2)  To qualify to be registered as an appraisal management company under this
chapter:
(a)  each individual who owns, directly or indirectly, more than 10% of the
appraisal management company shall:
(i)  be of good moral character, as determined by the board; and
(ii)  not have had a license or certificate to engage in an act related to a
real estate or mortgage transaction refused, denied, canceled, or revoked in
this state or in another state; and
(b)  the appraisal management company shall designate a main contact for
communication between the appraisal management company and either the board or
division who:
(i)  is a controlling person;
(ii)  is of good moral character, as determined by the board; and
(iii)  has not had a license or certificate to engage in an act related to a
real estate or mortgage transaction refused, denied, canceled, or revoked in
this state or in another state.
(3)  This section applies without regard to whether the entity uses the term:
(a)  "appraisal management company";
(b)  "mortgage technology company"; or
(c)  another name.
